Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVII.] HOMELESS PROGRAMS

Note

Homeless assistance working group (repealed June 30, 2016).
L 2013, c 222, §§15 to 17; L 2014, c 134, §7.

Return-to-home pilot program for eligible homeless
individuals (terminated on December 31, 2016). L 2013, c 222, §§12 to 14.

Working group on documentation for state civil identification
card; reports to 2016-2017 legislature (dissolved on June 30, 2017). L 2015, c
243.

[§346-361] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Donor" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, joint-stock company, unincorporated organization,
foundation, estate, trust, or any other person or firm that donates money, real
property, goods, or services to a homeless facility or any other program for
the homeless authorized by this part, including members of any governing body,
trustees, officers, partners, principals, stockholders, members, managers,
employees, contractors, agents of these entities, or any person who was
involved with the donation.

"Emergency shelter" means a homeless
facility designed to provide temporary shelter and appropriate and available
services to homeless families or individuals for a specified period of time.

"Homeless" means:

(1) An individual or family who lacks a fixed,
regular, and adequate night-time residence; or

(2) An individual or family who has a primary
night-time residence that is:

(A) A supervised publicly or privately
operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;

(B) An institution that provides temporary residence
for individuals intended to be institutionalized; or

(C) A public or private place not designed
for or ordinarily used as sleeping accommodations for human
beings.

This term does not include any individual imprisoned
or otherwise detained under an act of Congress or a state law.

"Homeless facility" means a
development designed to provide shelter for homeless families or individuals
pursuant to this part, or to facilitate any other homeless program authorized by
this part, and may include emergency or transitional shelters.

"Homeless shelter stipend" means a
payment to a provider agency or to the department on behalf of a homeless
family or individual to assist with the costs of operating a homeless facility
and providing appropriate services.

"Provider agency" means an
organization, including its governing board, officers, employees, contractors,
or agents, contracted by the department to provide labor and services to any
homeless facility or any other program for the homeless authorized by this part
that is:

(1) A for-profit organization incorporated under the
laws of the State; or

(2) A nonprofit organization determined by the
Internal Revenue Service to be exempt from the federal income tax; that has a
governing board whose members have no material conflict of interest and who
serve without compensation, and that has adopted bylaws or policies that
describe the manner in which business is conducted, including policies that
relate to nepotism and management of potential conflict of interest situations.

"Transitional shelter" means a
homeless facility designed to provide temporary shelter and appropriate and
available services to homeless families or individuals for up to twenty-four
months, pursuant to rule. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next